Arkansas, session 2025, HB1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-53-102(b)(1)(C)(iii), concerning
firefighting beyond municipal limits and claims for services, is amended to
read as follows:
(iii) The board shall use the Schedule of Equipment
Rates published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency of the United
States Department of Homeland Security, as in effect on January 1, 2013.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-22-901(b)(2)(C)(iii), concerning a
volunteer fire department's duty to respond to fires and claims for services,
is amended to read as follows:
(iii) The board shall use the Schedule of Equipment
Rates published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency of the United
States Department of Homeland Security, as in effect on January 1, 2013.

*SSS100*
02-24-2025 10:23:49 SSS100

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1414
/s/Andrews



































02-24-2025 10:23:49 SSS100